en: Suitable for animal type: Cow; Goat; Horse; Lama; Pig; Sheep; Universal; Other
ja: 動物タイプに適している: ウシ; ヤギ; ウマ; ラマ; ブタ; ヒツジ; ユニバーサル; その他
es: Adecuado para tipo de animal: Vaca; Cabra; Caballo; Lama; Cerdo; Oveja; Universal; Otros
lt-LT: Tinka gyvūnų rūšiai: Karvės; Ožkos; Arkliai; Lamos; Kiaulės; Avys; Universalus; Kita
bg-BG: Подходящ за животински вид: Крава; Коза; Кон; Лама; Свиня; Овца; Универсален; Други
vi: Phù hợp với loại động vật: Bò; Dê; Ngựa; Lạc đà Lama; Lợn; Cừu; Phổ biến; Khác
zh-CN: 适用动物类型: 奶牛; 山羊; 马; 羊驼; 猪; 羊; 通用; 其他
pl: Typ odpowiedni dla zwierząt: Krowa; Koza; Koń; Lama; Świnia; Owce; Uniwersalny; Inne
it: Tipo di animale ideale: Mucca; Capra; Cavallo; Lama; Maiale; Pecora; Universale; Altro
de: Geeignet für diese Tierart: Kuh; Ziege; Pferd; Lama; Schwein; Schaf; Universell; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ zvieraťa: Krava; Koza; Kôň; Lama; Prasa; Ovce; Univerzálny; Iné
nl: Geschikt voor diertype: Koe; Geit; Paard; Lama; Varken; Schaap; Universeel; Andere
zh-TW: 適用動物類型: 母牛; 山羊; 馬; 喇嘛; 豬; 羊; 通用; 其他
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทสัตว์: วัว; แพะ; ม้า; ลามะ; หมู; แกะ; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
hu: Állattípus: Tehén; Kecske; Ló; Láma; Sertés; Juh; Univerzális; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta životinje za koju je prikladno: Krava; Koza; Konj; Ljama; Svinja; Ovca; Univerzalno; Ostalo
fi: Soveltuu eläintyypille: Lehmä; Vuohi; Hevonen; Laama; Sika; Lammas; Yleinen; Muu
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de animal: Vacă; Capră; Cal; Lamă; Porc; Oaie; Universal; Altele
da: Velegnet til dyretype: Ko; Ged; Hest; Lama; Svin; Får; Universal; Andet
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de animal: Vaca; Cabra; Cavalo; Lama; Porco; Ovelha; Universal; Outro
ko: 적합한 동물: 소; 염소; 말; 라마; 돼지; 양; 범용; 기타
sv: Lämplig för djurtyp: Ko; Get; Häst; Lama; Gris; Får; Universell; Övrigt
ru: Для какого вида животных: Корова; Коза; Лошадь; Лама; Свинья; Овца; Универсальный; Другое
fr: Convient au type d’animal: Vache; Chèvre; Cheval; Lama; Cochon; Mouton; Universel; Autre
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto živali: Krava; Koza; Konj; Lama; Prašič; Ovce; Univerzalno; Drugo
cs: Vhodný typ zvířete: Kráva; Koza; Kůň; Lama; Prase; Ovce; Univerzální; Jiné
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο ζώου: Αγελάδα; Κατσίκα; Άλογο; Ιερέας του βούδα; Χοίρος; Πρόβατα; Universal; Άλλο
tr: Hayvan Tipine Uygun: İnek; Keçi; At; Lama; Domuz; Koyun; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
nb: Egnet for dyretype: Ku; Geit; Hest; Lama; Gris; Sau; Universal; Annet
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de animal: Vaca; Cabra; Cavalo; Lhama; Porco; Ovelha; Universal; Outro